Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-1532
Cease and desist orders; violations.

Any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person violating a cease and desist order of the director under section 44-1529 may after notice and hearing and upon order of the director be subject to:

(1) A monetary penalty of not more than thirty thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

(2) Suspension or revocation of the insurer's license or certificate of authority.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB326, § 8.